Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB453.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3273.1(a) and (b) of Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3273.1. Relationship to solid waste and surface mining.(a) General rule.--[The obligation to] An owner or operator of a well shall obtain a permit and post a bond under Articles III and V of the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, and [to] provide public notice under section 1905-A(b)(1)(v) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, for any pit, impoundment, method or facility employed for the disposal, processing or storage of residual wastes generated by the drilling of an oil or gas well or from the production of wells which is located on the well site.[, shall be considered 123456789101112131415161718 to have been satisfied if the owner or operator of the well meets the following conditions:(1) the well is permitted under the requirements of section 3211 (relating to well permits) or registered under section 3213 (relating to well registration and identification);(2) the owner or operator has satisfied the financial security requirements of section 3225 (relating to bonding) by obtaining a surety or collateral bond for the well and well site; and(3) the owner or operator maintains compliance with this chapter and applicable regulations of the Environmental Quality Board.](b) Noncoal surface mining.--Obligations under the act of December 19, 1984 (P.L.1093, No.219), known as the Noncoal Surface Mining Conservation and Reclamation Act, or a regulation promulgated under the Noncoal Surface Mining Conservation and Reclamation Act, for any borrow area where minerals are extracted solely for the purpose of oil and gas well development, including access road construction, shall be considered to have been satisfied if the owner or operator of the well meets the following conditions [imposed under subsection (a)(1) and (2) and]:(1) The well is permitted under the requirements of section 3211 (relating to well permits) or registered under section 3213 (relating to well registration and identification).(2) The owner or operator has satisfied the financial security requirements of section 3225 (relating to bonding) by obtaining a surety or collateral bond for the well and 20250SB0453PN0379 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 well site.(3) The owner or operator maintains compliance with this chapter and applicable regulations of the Environmental Quality Board.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0453PN0379 - 3 - 123456